assignment3-DinhCuongLuc.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +Inf +3P +PP +VPart an+ aus+

LEXICON Root
VerbPart ;

LEXICON VerbPart
0 :0 Verbs ;     ! no particle
an+ :an Verbs ;
aus+ :aus Verbs ;

LEXICON Verbs
machen+V :mach VerbForms ;
malen+V  :mal  VerbForms ;

LEXICON VerbForms
+Inf :en # ;
+3P  :t  # ;
+PP  :0  PastPart ;

LEXICON PastPart
0 :ge Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
mach :mach PP_End ;
mal  :mal  PP_End ;

LEXICON PP_End
0 :t # ;
